Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Chapter 10. Limitations of Actions.

Collateral references. —

51 Am. Jur. 2d, Limitation of Actions, § 1 et seq.

54 C.J.S., Limitations of Actions, § 1 et seq.

Validity of contractual waiver of statute of limitations, 1 ALR2d 1445.

Limitation period as affected by requirement of notice or presentation of claim against governmental body, 3 ALR2d 711.

New party brought in after statute has run, 8 ALR2d 6.

Fraud as tolling period for bringing action prescribed in statute creating the right of action, 15 ALR2d 500.

First and last day included or excluded for purposes of statute, 20 ALR2d 1249.

Tolling of statute of limitations where process is not served before expiration of limitation period, as affected by statutes defining commencement of action, or expressly relating to interruption of running of limitations, 27 ALR2d 236.

Promissory estoppel as to statutes of limitations, 48 ALR2d 1069.

Raising defense of statute by demurrer, equivalent motion to dismiss, or by motion for judgment on pleadings, 61 ALR2d 300.

Raising statute by motion for summary judgment, 61 ALR2d 341.

Validity of statute enlarging limitation period, 79 ALR2d 1080.

Character or kind of action or proceeding within operation of statute which permits new action after expiration of period of limitations, upon failure of previous actions commenced within the period, 79 ALR2d 1309.

Illness or death of party, counsel, or witness as excuse for failure to timely prosecute action, 80 ALR2d 1399.

General appearance as avoiding otherwise effective bar of statute of limitations, 82 ALR2d 1200.

Appointment of guardian for incompetent or for infant as affecting running of statute of limitations against ward, 86 ALR2d 965.

Statute limiting time for probate as applicable to will probated in another jurisdiction, 87 ALR2d 721.

Federal court’s adoption of state period of limitation, in action to enforce federally created right, as including related or subsidiary state laws or rules as to limitations, 90 ALR2d 265.

Extraterritorial operation of limitation applicable to statutory cause of action, other than by reason of “borrowing statute,” 95 ALR2d 1162.

Running of statute of limitations as affected by doctrine of relation back of appointment of administrator, 3 ALR3d 1234.

Validity of contractual time period, shorter than statute of limitations, for bringing action, 6 A.L.R.3d 1197.

What circumstances excuse failure to submit will for probate within time limit set by statute, 17 ALR3d 1361.

Settlement negotiations as estopping reliance on statute of limitations, 39 ALR3d 127.

Agreement of parties as estopping reliance on statute of limitations, 43 ALR3d 756.

Promises to settle or perform as estopping reliance on statute of limitations, 44 ALR3d 482.

Plaintiff’s diligence as affecting his right to have defendant estopped from pleading the statute of limitations, 44 ALR3d 760.

Fiduciary or confidential relationship as affecting estoppel to plead statute of limitations, 45 ALR3d 630.

Delay caused by other litigation as estopping reliance on statute of limitations, 45 ALR3d 703.

Validity of contractual provision establishing period of limitations longer than that provided by state statute of limitations, 84 ALR3d 1172.

Relation back of amended pleading substituting true name of defendant for fictitious name used in earlier pleading so as to avoid bar of limitations, 85 ALR3d 130.

Legal malpractice by permitting statutory time limitation to run against client’s claim, 90 ALR3d 293.

Delay in proceeding of disciplinary proceeding as defense or mitigating circumstance, 93 ALR3d 1057.

Statute of limitations as bar to arbitration under agreement, 94 ALR3d 533.

Laches or acquiescence as defense, so as to bar recovery or arrearages of permanent alimony or child support, 5 A.L.R.4th 1015.

Statutes of limiting time for commencement of action to establish paternity of illegitimate child as violating child’s constitutional rights, 16 ALR4th 926.

Claims for expenses of last sickness or for funeral expenses as within contemplation of statute requiring presentation of claims against decedent’s estate, or limiting time for bringing action thereon, 17 ALR4th 530.

What constitutes bringing action to trial or other activity sufficient to avoid dismissal under state statute or court rule, 32 ALR4th 840.

What constitutes rejection of claim against estate to commence running of statute applicable to rejected claims, 36 ALR4th 684.

Fraud as extending statutory limitations period for contesting will or its probate, 48 ALR4th 1094.

Time of discovery affecting running of statute of limitations, 49 ALR4th 972.

Computer sales and leases: Time when cause of action for failure of performance accrues, 90 ALR4th 298.

Time when cause of action accrues for civil action under state antitrust, monopoly or restraint of trade statutes, 90 ALR4th 1102.

Validity and construction of statute terminating right of action for product-caused injury at fixed period after manufacture, sale, or delivery of product, 30 ALR5th 1.

Which statute of limitations applies to efforts to compel arbitration of a dispute, 77 ALR4th 1071, 96 ALR Fed. 378.

Sec. 09.10.010.
General limitations on civil actions.

A person may not commence a civil action except within the periods prescribed in this chapter after the cause of action has accrued, except when, in special cases, a different limitation is prescribed by statute.

History.

(§ 1.01 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, “A person may not” was substituted for “No person may” to conform this section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Cross references. —

For commencement of action, see Civ.
R. 3; for relation back of amendment to pleading to date of original pleading, see Civ.
R. 15(c).

For provisions creating an alternative dispute resolution procedure within the existing civil litigation system, see § 54, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 15 AAC 21, art. 6.

Sec. 09.10.020.
When action commenced. [Repealed, § 1 ch 27 SLA 1966. For present law, see Civ. R. 3.]

Sec. 09.10.030.
Actions to recover real property.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person may not bring an action for the recovery of real property or for the recovery of the possession of it unless the action is commenced within 10 years. An action may not be maintained under this subsection for the recovery unless it appears that the plaintiff, an ancestor, a predecessor, or the grantor of the plaintiff was seized or possessed of the premises in question within 10 years before the commencement of the action.

An action may be brought at any time by a person who was seized or possessed of the real property in question at some time before the commencement of the action or whose grantor or predecessor was seized or possessed of the real property in question at some time before commencement of the action, and whose ownership interest in the real property is recorded under AS 40.17, in order to

quiet title to that real property; or

eject a person from that real property.

History.

(§ 1.03 ch 101 SLA 1962; am §§ 1, 2 ch 147 SLA 2003)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1994, “A person may not” was substituted for “No person may” and “the action is” was inserted after “unless” in the first sentence, and “An action may not” was substituted for “No action may” in the second sentence to conform this section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Cross references. —

For adverse possession, see AS

09.45.052

.

For provision providing that a municipality may not be divested of property by adverse possession, see AS

29.71.010

.

Editor's notes. —

Under § 5, ch. 147, SLA 2003, “AS

09.10.030

, as amended in secs. 1 and 2 of this Act, applies to actions that have not been barred before July 18, 2003 by AS

09.10.030

as it read before July 18, 2003.”

Sec. 09.10.040.
Action upon judgment or sealed instrument in 10 years.

A person may not bring an action upon a judgment or decree of a court of the United States, or of a state or territory within the United States, and an action may not be brought upon a sealed instrument, unless the action is commenced within 10 years.

[Repealed, § 54 ch 132 SLA 1998.]

History.

(§ 1.04 ch 101 SLA 1962; am §§ 1, 2 ch 86 SLA 1994; am §§ 2, 54 ch 132 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, “A person may not” was substituted for “No person may”, “an action may not” was substituted for “no action may”, and “the action is” was inserted after “unless” to conform this section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Cross references. —

For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendments to this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts. For effect of private seals and scrolls, see AS

09.25.095

.

Sec. 09.10.050.
Certain property actions to be brought in six years.

Unless the action is commenced within six years, a person may not bring an action for waste or trespass upon real property.

History.

(§ 1.05 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 1967; am § 2 ch 28 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 26 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For limitation on action against subdivider in contested transactions, see AS

34.55.030(f)

. For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.
For severability of the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 55, ch. 26, SLA 1997 provides that the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997 apply “to all causes of action accruing on or after August 7, 1997.”

Sec. 09.10.053.
Contract actions to be brought in three years.

Unless the action is commenced within three years, a person may not bring an action upon a contract or liability, express or implied, except as provided in AS

09.10.040

, or as otherwise provided by law, or, except if the provisions of this section are waived by contract.

History.

(§ 4 ch 26 SLA 1997; am § 8 ch 32 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.
For severability of the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 and § 45(b), ch. 32, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 55, ch. 26, SLA 1997 provides that the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997 apply “to all causes of action accruing on or after August 7, 1997.”
Under § 45(b), ch. 32, SLA 1997, this provision is also made applicable to the amendment to this section made by § 8, ch. 32, SLA 1997.

Legislative history reports. —

For purposes of the amendment to this section made by § 8,
ch. 32, SLA 1997, see 1997 House Journal Supp. No. 9.

Sec. 09.10.054.
Limits on when certain design, construction, and remodeling actions may be brought.

For actions covered under AS

09.45.881

—

09.45.899

, a claimant may not begin an action against a construction professional unless the notice of claim under AS

09.45.881

is given within one year after the claimant discovers the defect that is the subject of the action, except that the action may not be begun more than 10 years after substantial completion of the dwelling construction or remodeling that contains or implements the alleged defect.

A limitation imposed under this chapter for an action under AS

09.45.881

—

09.45.899

is tolled between the time the claimant serves notice under AS

09.45.881

and the time the claimant should reasonably understand that settlement under the procedures in AS 09.45.881 —

09.45.899

will not succeed.

In this section,

“action,” “claim,” “construction professional,” and “dwelling” have the meanings given in AS

09.45.899

;

“substantial completion” means the date when the construction or remodeling is sufficiently completed to allow the owner of the dwelling or a person authorized by the owner to use or occupy the dwelling or the improvement to the dwelling in the manner for which the dwelling or improvement was intended.

History.

(§ 2 ch 136 SLA 2003)

Sec. 09.10.055.
Statute of repose of 10 years.

Notwithstanding the disability of minority described under AS

09.10.140(a)

, a person may not bring an action for personal injury, death, or property damage unless commenced within 10 years of the earlier of the date of

substantial completion of the construction alleged to have caused the personal injury, death, or property damage; however, the limitation of this paragraph does not apply to a claim resulting from an intentional or reckless disregard of specific project design plans and specifications or building codes; in this paragraph, “substantial completion” means the date when construction is sufficiently completed to allow the owner or a person authorized by the owner to occupy the improvement or to use the improvement in the manner for which it was intended; or

the last act alleged to have caused the personal injury, death, or property damage.

This section does not apply if

the personal injury, death, or property damage resulted from

prolonged exposure to hazardous waste;

an intentional act or gross negligence;

fraud or misrepresentation;

breach of an express warranty or guarantee;

a defective product; in this subparagraph, “product” means an object that has intrinsic value, is capable of delivery as an assembled whole or as a component part, and is introduced into trade or commerce; or

breach of trust or fiduciary duty;

the facts that would give notice of a potential cause of action are intentionally concealed;

a shorter period of time for bringing the action is imposed under another provision of law;

the provisions of this section are waived by contract; or

the facts that would constitute accrual of a cause of action of a minor are not discoverable in the exercise of reasonable care by the minor’s parent or guardian.

The limitation imposed under (a) of this section is tolled during any period in which there exists the undiscovered presence of a foreign body that has no therapeutic or diagnostic purpose or effect in the body of the injured person and the action is based on the presence of the foreign body.

History.

(§ 2 ch 61 SLA 1967; am § 3 ch 28 SLA 1994; am § 5 ch 26 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings in connection with the 1994 amendment of this section, and for applicability of those amendments, see §§ 1 and 4, ch. 28, SLA 1994 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.
For severability of the provisions ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 55, ch. 26, SLA 1997 provides that the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997 apply “to all causes of action accruing on or after August 7, 1997.”

Sec. 09.10.060.
Actions for certain statutory penalties to be brought in three years.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 70 SLA 1996.]

A person may not bring an action upon a statute for penalty or forfeiture where the action is given to the party aggrieved or to that party and the state unless the action is brought within three years, except where the statute imposing it prescribes a different limitation.

[Renumbered as AS

09.10.065

.]

History.

(§ 1.06 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 70 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 81 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, “A person may not” was substituted for “No person may” in (a) and (b) of this section, and “the action is” was inserted after “unless” in (a), (b), and (c) of this section to conform this section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 70, SLA 1996 provides that the repeal of subsection (a) “applies to civil actions commenced on or after September 16, 1996 regardless of when the cause of action may have risen.”

Sec. 09.10.065.
Commencement of actions for acts constituting sexual offenses.

A person may bring an action at any time for conduct that would have, at the time the conduct occurred, violated provisions of any of the following offenses:

felony sexual abuse of a minor;

felony sexual assault;

unlawful exploitation of a minor;

felony sex trafficking; or

felony human trafficking.

Unless the action is commenced within three years of the accrual of the claim for relief, a person may not bring an action for conduct that would have, at the time the conduct occurred, violated the provisions of any of the following offenses:

misdemeanor sexual abuse of a minor;

misdemeanor sexual assault;

incest; or

felony indecent exposure.

History.

(§ 1 ch 4 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 81 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 2001; am §§ 1, 2 ch 40 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 43 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

09.10.060(c)

; renumbered in 2002.

Cross references. —

For provisions related to this section, see AS

09.10.140(b)

.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2013 (SB 22), see 2013 Senate Journal 38 — 39.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(4) and (a)(5), and made related changes.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 46(a), ch. 43, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to (a) of this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2013.

Sec. 09.10.070.
Actions for torts, for injury to personal property, for certain statutory liabilities, and against peace officers and coroners to be brought in two years.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a person may not bring an action (1) for libel, slander, assault, battery, seduction, or false imprisonment, (2) for personal injury or death, or injury to the rights of another not arising on contract and not specifically provided otherwise; (3) for taking, detaining, or injuring personal property, including an action for its specific recovery; (4) upon a statute for a forfeiture or penalty to the state; or (5) upon a liability created by statute, other than a penalty or forfeiture; unless the action is commenced within two years of the accrual of the cause of action.

A person may not bring an action against a peace officer or coroner upon a liability incurred by the doing of an act in an official capacity or by the omission of an official duty, including the nonpayment of money collected upon an execution, unless brought within two years. This subsection does not apply to an action for an escape.

History.

(§ 1.07 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 26 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, “A person may not” was substituted for “No person may” and “the action is” was inserted after “unless” to conform this section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.
For severability of the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 70, SLA 1996 provides that subsection (b), as added by § 1, ch. 70, SLA 1996, “applies to civil actions commenced on or after September 16, 1996 regardless of when the cause of action may have risen.”

Section 55, ch. 26, SLA 1997 provides that the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997 apply “to all causes of action accruing on or after August 7, 1997.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

Revocation proceedings against a commercial fisheries permit holder, who allegedly submitted false information with respect to his residency in his initial application for an entry permit and in his requests for renewal of the permit, were governed by the six-year period set forth in AS

09.10.120

(actions by state or political subdivision), not the two-year statute of limitation found in AS

09.10.070

(2) [now (a)(4)] (forfeiture or penalty). Aug. 17, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 09.10.075.
Actions related to claims based on medical assistance payment fraud.

Except as provided in AS

09.58.070

, a person may not bring an action under AS

09.58.010

—

09.58.025

unless the action is commenced by (1) six years after the act or omission was committed, or (2) three years after the date when facts material to the action were known, or reasonably should have been known, by the attorney general or the Department of Health and Social Services, whichever is later, but in no event more than 10 years after the date the violation under AS

09.58.010

occurred.

History.

(§ 16 ch 25 SLA 2016; am § 2 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, replaced “AS

09.58.010

—

09.58.060

” with “AS

09.58.010

—

09.58.025

”.

Effective dates. —

Section 16, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on September 19, 2016.

Sec. 09.10.080.
Actions related to escape to be brought in one year.

A person may not bring an action against a peace officer for the escape of a person arrested or imprisoned on civil process unless the action is commenced within one year.

History.

(§ 1.08 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, “A person may not” was substituted for “No person may” and “the action is” was inserted after “unless” to conform this section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Sec. 09.10.090.
Actions for penalty.

A person may not bring an action upon a statute for the penalty given in whole or in part to the person who will prosecute for the same unless the action is commenced within one year after the commission of the offense. If the action is not commenced within one year by a private party, it may be commenced on behalf of the state within two years after the period of limitation by a private party has expired.

History.

(§ 1.09 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, “A person may not” was substituted for “No person may” and “the action is” was inserted after “unless” to conform this section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Sec. 09.10.100.
Other actions in 10 years.

An action for a cause not otherwise provided for may be commenced within 10 years after the cause of action has accrued.

History.

(§ 1.10 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.10.110.
Accrual of cause of action upon mutual, open, and current account.

In an action brought to recover a balance due upon a mutual, open, and current account where there have been reciprocal demands between the parties, the cause of action accrues from the date of the last item proved in the account on either side.
But when a period of more than one year elapses between any of a series of items or demands, they are not included as part of the account.

History.

(§ 1.11 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

When is account “mutual” for purposes of rule that limitations run from last item in open, current, and mutual account, 45 ALR3d 446.

Sec. 09.10.120.
Actions in name of state, political subdivisions, or public corporations.

Except as provided in AS

09.10.075

, an action brought in the name of or for the benefit of the state, any political subdivision, or public corporation may be commenced only within six years after the date of accrual of the cause of action. However, if the action is for relief on the ground of fraud, the limitation commences from the time of discovery by the aggrieved party of the facts constituting the fraud.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section or another provision of law, the state may bring an action in the name of or for the benefit of the state to (1) quiet or confirm the state’s interests in real property, or (2) protect resources held in trust for the public, at any time.

History.

(§ 1.12 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 1997; am § 17 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, in (a), added “Except as provided in AS

09.10.075

, an” at the beginning of the subsection, and made a related change.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Revocation proceedings against a commercial fisheries permit holder, who allegedly submitted false information with respect to his residency in his initial application for an entry permit and in his requests for renewal of the permit, were governed by the six-year period set forth in this section (actions by state or political subdivision), not the two-year statute of limitation found in AS

09.10.070

(2) [now (a)(2)] (forfeiture or penalty). Aug. 17, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 09.10.130.
Effect of absence from state or concealment.

When the cause of action accrues against a person who is out of the state or concealed in the state, the action may be commenced within the periods provided in this chapter after that person returns to the state or when the concealment ceases.
If a person departs from the state or conceals one’s person after the cause of action accrues, the time of absence or concealment is not part of the time limited for the commencement of the action.

History.

(§ 1.13 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.10.140.
Disabilities of minority and incompetency.

Except as provided under (c) of this section, if a person entitled to bring an action mentioned in this chapter is at the time the cause of action accrues either (1) under the age of majority, or (2) incompetent by reason of mental illness or mental disability, the time of a disability identified in (1) or (2) of this subsection is not a part of the time limit for the commencement of the action. Except as provided in (b) of this section, the period within which the action may be brought is not extended in any case longer than two years after the disability ceases.

An action based on a claim of sexual abuse under AS

09.55.650

that is subject to AS

09.10.065(b)

may be brought more than three years after the plaintiff reaches the age of majority if it is brought under the following circumstances:

if the claim asserts that the defendant committed one act of sexual abuse on the plaintiff, the plaintiff shall commence the action within three years after the plaintiff discovered or through use of reasonable diligence should have discovered that the act caused the injury or condition;

if the claim asserts that the defendant committed more than one act of sexual abuse on the plaintiff, the plaintiff shall commence the action within three years after the plaintiff discovered or through use of reasonable diligence should have discovered the effect of the injury or condition attributable to the series of acts; a claim based on an assertion of more than one act of sexual abuse is not limited to plaintiff’s first discovery of the relationship between any one of those acts and the injury or condition, but may be based on plaintiff’s discovery of the effect of the series of acts.

In an action for personal injury of a person who was under the age of eight years at the time of the injury, the time period before the person’s eighth birthday is not a part of the time limit imposed under AS

09.10.070(a)

for commencing the civil action.

History.

(§ 1.14 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1979; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 1986; am §§ 2, 3 ch 4 SLA 1990; am §§ 7, 8 ch 26 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 40 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For limitation period on claim of sexual abuse, see AS

09.10.065

.
For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.
For severability of the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11, ch. 4, SLA 1990 provides that the 1990 amendments to this section “apply to all actions commenced on or after February 2, 1990, regardless of when the cause of action may have arisen.”

Section 55, ch. 26, SLA 1997 provides that the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997 apply “to all causes of action accruing on or after August 7, 1997.”

Sec. 09.10.150.
Death of a party before expiration of limitation period. [Repealed, § 5 ch 78 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 09.10.160.
Disability of alien during war.

When a person is an alien subject or citizen of a country at war with the United States, the time of the continuance of the war is not a part of the period limited for the commencement of the action.

History.

(§ 1.16 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.10.170.
Commencement stayed by injunction or statute.

When the commencement of an action is stayed by injunction or a statutory prohibition, the time of the continuance of the injunction or prohibition is not a part of the time limited for the commencement of the action.

History.

(§ 1.17 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.10.180.
Time at which disability exists.

A person may not claim the benefit of a disability unless it existed when the right of action accrued or began before the time for commencing the action expired.

History.

(§ 1.18 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, “A person may not” was substituted for “No person may” to conform this section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Sec. 09.10.190.
Coexisting disabilities.

When two or more disabilities coexist at the time the right of action accrues, the limitation does not attach until they all are removed.

History.

(§ 1.19 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.10.200.
Acknowledgment or promise.

No acknowledgment or promise is sufficient evidence of a new or continuing contract to take the case out of the operation of this chapter unless the acknowledgment or promise is contained in writing, signed by the party to be charged, and, as to instruments affecting real estate, acknowledged and recorded in the office of the recorder of the district where the original contract was filed or recorded. This section does not alter the effect of any payment of principal or interest.

History.

(§ 1.20 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.10.210.
Past due payments.

When a past due payment of principal or interest is made upon any evidence of indebtedness, the running of the time within which an action may be commenced starts from the time the last payment is made.

History.

(§ 1.21 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.10.220.
Action arising in other jurisdictions between nonresidents.

When a cause of action has arisen in another state or in a territory or foreign country between nonresidents of this state, and by the laws of the state, territory, or country where the cause of action arose that action cannot be maintained because of a lapse of time, the action may not be maintained in this state.

History.

(§ 1.22 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.10.230.
Certain actions relating to real property.

A person may not bring an action for the determination of a right or claim to or interest in real property unless commenced within the limitations provided for actions for the recovery of the possession of real property.
However, a person may not bring an action to set aside, cancel, annul, or otherwise affect a patent to land issued by this state or the United States, or to compel a person claiming or holding under a patent to convey the land described in the patent or a portion of the land to the plaintiff in the action, or to hold the land in trust for or to the use and benefit of the plaintiff, or on account of any matter, thing, or transaction that was had, done, suffered, or transpired before the date of the patent unless the action is commenced within 10 years from the date of the patent. In an action upon a new promise, fraud, or mistake, the running of the time within which an action may be commenced starts from the making of the new promise or the discovery of the fraud or mistake. This section does not bar an equitable owner in possession of real property from defending possession by means of the equitable title. The right of an equitable owner to defend possession in an action or by complaint for injunction is not barred by lapse of time while an action for the possession of the real property is not barred by the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1.23 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, in the first sentence of this section “A person may not” was substituted for “No person may”, and in the second sentence “However, a person may not” was substituted for “But no person may” and “the action is” was inserted after “unless” to conform this section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Sec. 09.10.240.
Commencement of action after dismissal or reversal.

If an action is commenced within the time prescribed and is dismissed upon the trial or upon appeal after the time limited for bringing a new action, the plaintiff or, if the plaintiff dies and the cause of action in favor of the plaintiff survives, the heirs or representatives may commence a new action upon the cause of action within one year after the dismissal or reversal on appeal.
All defenses available against the action, if brought within the time limited, are available against the action when brought under this provision.

History.

(§ 1.24 ch 101 SLA 1962)